Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1708
Massage therapy; persons excepted.

The Massage Therapy Practice Act shall not be construed to include the following classes of persons:

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons, osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, registered nurses, practical nurses, cosmetologists, estheticians, nail technicians, physical therapists, barbers, and other persons credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act who are exclusively engaged in the practice of their respective professions;

(2) Physicians who serve in the armed forces of the United States or the United States Public Health Service or who are employed by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal agencies, if their practice is limited to that service or employment;

(3) Students performing massage therapy services when they render such services within the scope of an approved massage therapy school under the supervision of a licensed massage therapist; and

(4) Individuals who hold a current license as a massage therapist in another state and who travel with and provide massage therapy services to theatrical groups, entertainers, or athletic organizations.

Laws 1955, c. 273, § 2, p. 862;

Laws 1957, c. 297, § 1, p. 1070;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-2702;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 133;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 28;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,279;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 615.